Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1701
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 70-1701 to 70-1705:

(1) Power has the same meaning as in section 70-601; and

(2) Public entity means a municipality, a registered group of municipalities, a public power district, a public power and irrigation district, an electric cooperative, an electric membership association, a joint entity formed under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, a joint public agency formed under the Joint Public Agency Act, an agency formed under the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, or any other governmental body or subdivision of government.

Laws 2004, LB 969, § 1.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.

Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, see section 18-2401.